California statutes. Fish and Game Code
(b) If the commission finds that the operation has caused deterioration of the natural run of anadromous fish in the waters covered by the permit, it may require the permittee to return the fishery to the same condition as was prior to issuance of the permit. If the permittee fails to take appropriate action, the commission may direct the department to take the action, and the permittee shall bear any cost incurred by the department.

(c) Prior to release into state waters and at any other time deemed necessary by the department, the fish may be examined by the department to determine that they are not diseased or infected with any disease which, in the opinion of the department, may be detrimental to the state fishery resources.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1244, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1175.

The state shall assume no responsibility for the operation of a hatchery pursuant to this article and shall not be in any manner liable for its operation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 862.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Cooperative Salmon and Steelhead Rearing Facilities [1200. - 1206.]

1200.

The department is authorized to enter into agreements with counties, nonprofit groups, private persons, individually or in combination, for the management and operation of rearing facilities for salmon and steelhead. All such agreements shall be in accordance with the policies of the commission and the criteria of the department which govern the operation under such agreements.

The purpose for operating such facilities shall be to provide additional fishing resources and to augment natural runs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1173.)
-------------------------------------------

1201.

An applicant who wishes to enter into an agreement to operate a rearing facility shall demonstrate, to the satisfaction of the department prior to executing such agreement, such applicant’s financial ability to properly operate the rearing facility. The department shall develop and specify the means for an applicant to make such a demonstration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1173.)
-------------------------------------------

1202.

All fish handled or released under authority of this article are the property of the state and may be taken only after their release into the wild and under the authority of a sport or commercial fishing license.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1173.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.

The release of fish reared in facilities pursuant to this article shall be made in accordance with the policy of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1173.)
-------------------------------------------

1204.

The department shall fund the agreements provided for in Section 1200 only on a matching basis with the persons or entities who enter into such agreements. Funds appropriated for the purposes of this article shall not be used to purchase equipment or for construction.

The department shall be reimbursed from funds appropriated for the purposes of this article for administrative costs, legal costs, and supervisorial costs relating to the execution and supervision of such agreements by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1173.)
-------------------------------------------

1205.

The department shall, subject to the limitations of appropriate egg sources and funding, make available fish of appropriate size and species to persons or entities who enter into agreements pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1173.)
-------------------------------------------

1206.

Salmon and steelhead raised pursuant to this article shall be released in streams, rivers, or waters north of Point Conception and upon release shall have unimpeded access to the sea.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1173.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6.5. Transgenic Species of Salmonids [1210. - 1210.]

1210.

(a) The hatchery production and stocking of transgenic species of salmonids is prohibited.

(b) As used in this section, “transgenic” has the same meaning as in Section 1.92 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, as that section read on May 14, 2003.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 444, Sec. 1.   (AB 504)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Nonprofit Partnerships [1225. - 1227.]

1225.

All moneys collected or received from gifts or bequests, or from municipal or county appropriations or donations for purposes relating to conservation programs, projects, and activities by the department shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the Fish and Game Preservation Fund. All moneys deposited pursuant to this section shall be used for purposes relating to conservation programs, projects, and activities by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 559, Sec. 16.   (AB 2402)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1226.

(a) The department may enter into one or more agreements to accept funds from any person, nonprofit organization, or other public or private entity for purposes relating to conservation programs, projects, and activities by the department. Any funds received pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Fish and Game Preservation Fund. The funds received shall supplement existing resources for purposes relating to conservation programs, projects, and activities by the department.

(b) The department may enter into one or more agreements to accept services from any person, nonprofit organization, or other public or private entity for purposes relating to
 conservation programs, projects, and activities by the department. Under the direction of the department, these services shall supplement existing staff resources. Agreements for services for the management and operation of department-managed lands shall be subject to the provisions of Section 1745.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 559, Sec. 16.   (AB 2402)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1227.

Notwithstanding any other law, the department may enter into one or more agreements with a person, nonprofit organization, or other public or private entity, as may be appropriate, to assist the department in its efforts to secure long-term private funding sources for purposes relating to conservation programs, projects, and activities by the department. The authority to enter into an agreement under this section shall include, but not be limited to, the authority to secure donations, memberships, corporate and individual sponsorships, and marketing and licensing agreements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 154, Sec. 35.   (AB 1527)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Wildlife Conservation Law of 1947 [1300. - 1375.]



  ARTICLE 1. Generally [1300. - 1301.]

1300.

This chapter is known and may be cited as the Wildlife Conservation Law of 1947.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

1301.

The preservation, protection and restoration of wildlife within the State is an inseparable part of providing adequate recreation for our people in the interest of public welfare; and it is the policy of the State to acquire and restore to the highest possible level, and maintain in a state of high productivity, those areas that can be most successfully used to sustain wildlife and which will provide adequate and suitable recreation. To carry out these purposes, a single and coordinated program for the acquisition of lands and facilities suitable for recreational purposes, and adaptable for conservation, propagation, and utilization of the fish and game resources of the State, is established.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. The Wildlife Conservation Board [1320. - 1324.]

1320.

(a) There is in the department the Wildlife Conservation Board, hereafter referred to as the board. The board consists of the president of the commission, the director, the Director of Finance, and four public members appointed pursuant to subdivision (b).

(b) (1) The Speaker of the Assembly and the Senate Committee on Rules shall each appoint a public member to serve on the
 board and the Governor shall appoint two public members to serve on the board. The public members shall each serve a term of four years. If a vacancy occurs during the term of a public member, the appointing authority shall appoint a person to fill the vacancy for a term of four years.

(2) Each public member shall have demonstrated interest and expertise in land acquisition for conservation purposes, including, but not limited to, any of the following:

(A) Experience with activities that benefit disadvantaged communities identified pursuant to Section 39711 of the Health and Safety Code.

(B) Experience with a land conservation nonprofit organization, a public agency focused on land conservation, or public land management.

(C) Experience as a professional with expertise in one or more functions of the board, including conservation easements or other interests in real estate designed to further the mission of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 481, Sec. 1.   (SB 1089)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1321.

The chairman of the board shall be elected by the members of the board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

1322.

The members of the board shall receive their actual and necessary traveling expenses, which shall be paid from the Wildlife Restoration Fund.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

1323.

Three Members of the Senate, appointed by the Committee on Rules thereof, and three Members of the Assembly, appointed by the Speaker thereof, shall meet with the board and participate in its activities to the extent that such participation is not incompatible with their respective positions as Members of the Legislature.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

1324.

For the purposes of this chapter, the Members of the Legislature shall constitute an interim investigating committee on the subject of this chapter and as such shall have the powers and duties imposed upon such a committee by the Joint Rules of the Senate and the Assembly.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Powers and Purposes [1345. - 1356.]

1345.

(a) The board shall investigate, study, and determine what areas within the state are most essential and suitable for wildlife production and preservation, and will provide suitable recreation; and shall ascertain and determine what lands within the state are suitable for game propagation, game refuges, bird refuges, waterfowl refuges, game farms, fish hatcheries, game management areas, and what streams and lakes are suitable for, or can be made suitable for, fishing and hunting.

(b) In determining which areas are suitable for fishing and hunting, the board, in consultation with the department, shall take into consideration areas of the state where public access and opportunity for fishing and hunting are most
 needed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 294, Sec. 6.   (AB 1442)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1346.

The board shall also ascertain what lands are suitable for providing cover for the propagation and rearing in a wild state of waterfowl, shore birds, and upland birds, and the possibilities of acquiring easements on such lands to provide such cover.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

1347.

As a result of the studies, the board shall determine what areas, lands, or rights in lands or waters should be acquired by the state in order to effectuate a coordinated and balanced program resulting in the maximum restoration of wildlife in the state and in the maximum recreational advantages to the people of the state.

This section shall become operative on July 1, 1993.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 1) and added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 452, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Section operative July 1, 1993, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1348.

(a) The board shall authorize the acquisition of real property, rights in real property, water, or water rights as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter. The board may authorize acquisition by the department, but the department shall not acquire any property pursuant to this subdivision by eminent domain proceedings except that property as may be necessary to provide access roads or rights-of-way to areas to be used for fishing the coastal waters of the Pacific Ocean, and then only if the board of supervisors of the affected county has agreed by resolution to those proceedings for each parcel of land, and has further agreed by resolution to maintain the road or right-of-way. The board may authorize acquisition by the State
 Public Works Board, which may effect acquisitions pursuant to the Property Acquisition
 Law (Part 11 (commencing with Section 15850) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(b) For the purposes of this chapter and Chapter 4.1 (commencing with Section 1385), the board may authorize the acquisition of interests in real property and water rights by means of gifts, purchases, leases, easements, the transfer or exchange of property for other property of like value, transfers of development rights or credits, and purchases of development rights, conservation easements, and other interests.

(c) To further implement this chapter and Chapter 4.1 (commencing with Section 1385), the board may authorize the department to do any of the following:

(1) Accept federal grants and receive gifts,
 donations, subventions, rents, royalties, and other financial support from public or private sources. Proceeds received from any of these sources shall be deposited in the Wildlife Restoration Fund or the Fish and Game Preservation Fund.

(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, lease, sell, exchange, or otherwise transfer any real property, interest in real property, or option acquired by or held under the jurisdiction of the board or the department. Except as provided in Section 1355, proceeds from transactions entered into pursuant to this paragraph shall be deposited in the Wildlife Restoration Fund or the Fish and Game Preservation Fund.

(3) Lease degraded potential wildlife habitat real property to nonprofit organizations, local governmental agencies, or state and federal
 agencies if the lessee agrees to restore the real property to its highest possible wildlife habitat value and maintain the real property at that highest possible wildlife habitat value. If feasible, during the period of lease, the board may require that the real property be open to the public for compatible recreational opportunities. Proceeds from any lease or rental and interest thereon shall be deposited in the Wildlife Restoration Fund or the Fish and Game Preservation Fund.

(4) Acquire former wildlife habitat real property, including riparian habitat real property, restore and sell the real property, or any interest therein, to private owners, local governmental agencies, or state departments and agencies, or exchange the property for other real property, if a written and recorded agreement is first secured to keep and maintain the real
 property as wildlife habitat in perpetuity. The agreement shall contain a reversion if the real property sold or exchanged is not maintained as wildlife habitat. The agreement containing the reversion shall be set forth in any conveyance transferring any real property, interest in real property, or option subject to this section. Proceeds from the sales shall be deposited in the Wildlife Restoration Fund or the Fish and Game Preservation Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 115, Sec. 5.   (AB 148)   Effective July 22, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1348.1.

Before the board authorizes the purchase of any land, or any interest therein, the board shall notify all owners of record of adjacent parcels of land of the intent of the board to purchase the land. The notice to the adjacent owners of land and the public notice shall include an explanation of the proposed use of the land by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1287, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1348.2.

When the board acquires real property, other than by eminent domain, the purchase price for the real property shall not exceed the fair market value of the property, as defined in Section 1263.320 of the Code of Civil Procedure. The fair market value shall be set forth in an appraisal that is (a) prepared by a licensed real estate appraiser, and (b) approved by the Department of General Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 485, Sec. 73.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

1348.3.

(a) No governmental entity may condemn any wildlife conservation easement acquired by a state agency, except as provided in subdivision (b). As used in this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Public use” as used in Article 6 (commencing with Section 1240.510) and Article 7 (commencing with Section 1240.610) of Chapter 3 of Title 7 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure means privately owned lands managed for habitat in public trust.

(2) “Wildlife conservation easement” means a recorded conservation easement, as defined in Section 815.1 of the Civil Code, that exists or will exist for at least 10 years and that is acquired and held by a state agency and administered
 primarily for the benefit of wildlife.

(b) Prior to the initiation by a governmental entity of condemnation proceedings against a wildlife conservation easement acquired by a state agency, the governmental entity shall give notice to the holder of the easement, provide an opportunity for the holder of the easement to consult with the governmental agency, provide the holder of the easement the opportunity to state its objections to the condemnation, and provide a response to the objections. Article 6 (commencing with Section 1240.510) and Article 7 (commencing with Section 1240.610) of Chapter 3 of Title 7 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure shall apply to condemnation proceedings initiated by a governmental entity against a wildlife conservation easement acquired by a state agency. In those proceedings, the condemning governmental entity shall be required to prove by clear and convincing evidence that its proposed use satisfies the
 requirements of Article 6 (commencing with Section 1240.510) or Article 7 (commencing with Section 1240.610) of Chapter 3 of Title 7 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 17.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1349.

No farm lands may be acquired under the provisions of this chapter by proceedings in eminent domain except by specific authorization of the Legislature, notwithstanding any provision of Section 1348. Nothing in this section shall apply to any proceedings to acquire farm lands when the owner thereof has consented to, or requested the institution of, such proceedings.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

1350.

(a) (1) The department shall, when authorized by the board, construct in accordance with law those facilities as are suitable for the purpose for which the real property or rights in real property or water, or water rights, were acquired. Each completed project shall be managed and maintained by the department.

(2) The department, with the approval of the board, may enter into agreements with any other department or agency of this state, any local agency, any California Native American tribe, as defined in Section 21073 of the Public Resources Code, or any
 nonprofit organization, to provide for the construction, management, or maintenance of the facilities authorized by the board, and such other department or agency of this state, local agency, California Native American tribe, or nonprofit organization, and each of them may construct, manage, or maintain those facilities pursuant to the agreement. Work performed by a local agency, California Native American tribe, or nonprofit organization under those agreements is exempt from Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 10100) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code. However, nothing in this section shall be construed to exempt any work from Part 7 (commencing with Section 1720) of Division
 2 of the Labor Code.

(b) The department, when authorized by the board, may apply for and accept federal grants, and receive gifts, donations, and other financial support from public or private sources to be used for fish and wildlife habitat enhancement, including riparian habitat restoration projects on real property or waters for which the state obtains an interest. Funds received from any of those sources shall be deposited in the Wildlife Restoration Fund or the Fish and Game Preservation Fund.

(c) The board may award grants or loans to nonprofit organizations, local governmental agencies, federal agencies, state agencies, and California Native American tribes
 for the purposes of fish and wildlife habitat restoration, enhancement, management, protection and improvement of riparian resources, and for development of compatible public access facilities in the same manner and subject to the same terms and conditions as prescribed in Section 31116 of the Public Resources Code. Proceeds from repayment of any loans and the interest thereon shall be deposited in the Wildlife Restoration Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 701, Sec. 1.   (AB 379)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1351.

Each recreational area shall be so managed and controlled that the public shall have access to and use of the area for all recreational purposes.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

1352.

(a) The money in the Wildlife Restoration Fund, as provided for by former Section 19632 of the Business and Professions Code, as that section read on January 1, 2024, is available for expenditure under this chapter.

(b) All federal moneys made available for projects authorized by the board shall be deposited into the Wildlife Restoration Fund or the Fish and Game Preservation Fund.

(c) Any moneys received into the Wildlife Restoration Fund or the Fish and Game Preservation Fund from leases authorized pursuant to paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 1348 shall be expended, upon appropriation by the Legislature, by the department for purposes of managing, maintaining, restoring, or operating
 lands owned and managed by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 72.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1352.5.

(a) The San Francisco Baylands Restoration Program Account is hereby established within the Wildlife Restoration Fund, as provided for by former Section 19632 of the Business and Professions Code, as that section read on January 1, 2024, for the purpose of acquiring and restoring wetlands and lands that may be enhanced to support wetlands in the San Francisco Bay area in order to achieve the objectives of the Baylands Ecosystem Habitat Goals Report (Goals Report).

(b) Funds in the account may be expended by the board to acquire any lands identified in the Goals Report that are available for acquisition subject to the following conditions:

(1) The purchase price shall not exceed the fair market value
 of the property, as determined by an appraisal conducted pursuant to Section 1348.2. The appraisal shall also consider and describe all the specific requirements and restrictions of relevant state and federal laws, including, but not limited to, the McAteer-Petris Act (Title 7.2 (commencing with Section 66600) of the Government Code), related to the property value and development potential of lands considered for acquisition in the shoreline band of the San Francisco Bay area.

(2) The board has determined any of the following:

(A) Funds are available to implement the recommendations and objectives of the Goals Report for a significant portion of the property to be acquired by the board.

(B) Sufficient funding and authority exists for the long-term maintenance of all levees and dikes and all other land-use management
 requirements necessary to avoid environmental degradation for the property proposed to be acquired by the board.

(C) The property to be acquired by the board has no unique long-term maintenance requirements or has no land-use management requirements necessary to avoid environmental degradation.

(3) If the board determines to acquire all or a portion of the Cargill property, a matching federal appropriation for the acquisition of the Cargill property shall be deposited into an account solely for the acquisition of the Cargill property or a portion thereof.

(4) The board has consulted with the State Coastal Conservancy and determined that the proposed acquisition is consistent with most of the goals of the San Francisco Bay Area Conservancy Program, as described in Section 31162 of the Public Resources Code.

(5) The acquisition of the property will not result in any liability to the state for the cleanup of hazardous materials.

(c) “Cargill property,” for purposes of this section, means all property owned by the Cargill Salt Division that Cargill proposes to sell to the state and federal governments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 73.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1353.

The board may purchase such boats, aircraft, or equipment as it deems necessary for the use of the department for the improvement and protection of marine fisheries.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

1354.

The board may authorize the acquisition of such lands or rights in land as may be necessary for the purpose of furnishing public access to lands or waters open to the public for fishing, hunting and shooting. The board may authorize such acquisition by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 754.)
-------------------------------------------

1355.

The net proceeds of the sale or other disposition of real property used as a fish hatchery that has been acquired by or is under the jurisdiction of the board or the department, either in easement or in fee, shall be deposited in the Wildlife Restoration Fund or the Fish and Game Preservation Fund, as determined by the board, and shall be available for acquisition, enhancement, restoration, or construction projects for the benefit of wildlife.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 935, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1356.

The board, when it prioritizes the use of available funds for proposed acquisitions, with regard to the priority of a proposal to acquire forestland, may consider and take into account the potential of that proposed acquisition to beneficially reduce or sequester greenhouse gas emissions. The board may use policies, protocols, or other relevant information developed by the California Climate Action Registry as a basis for determining a project’s potential to reduce or sequester greenhouse gas emissions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 469, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.5. Oak Woodlands Conservation Act [1360. - 1372.]

1360.

This article shall be known, and may be cited, as the Oak Woodlands Conservation Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 588, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1361.

For purposes of this article, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Board” means the Wildlife Conservation Board established pursuant to Section 1320.

(b) “Conservation easement” means a conservation easement, as defined in Section 815.1 of the Civil Code.

(c) “Fund” means the Oak Woodlands Conservation Fund.

(d) “Land improvement” means restoration or enhancement of biologically functional oak woodlands habitat.

(e) “Local government entity” means any city, county, city and county, district, or other local government entity, if the entity is otherwise authorized to acquire and hold title to real property.

(f) “Nonprofit organization” means a tax-exempt nonprofit organization that meets the requirements of subdivision (a) of Section 815.3 of the Civil Code.

(g) “Oak” means any species in the genus Quercus.

(h) “Oak woodlands” means an oak stand with a greater than 10 percent canopy cover or that may have historically supported greater than 10 percent canopy cover.

(i) “Oak woodlands management plan” means a plan that provides protection for oak woodlands over time and compensates private landowners for conserving oak woodlands.

(j) “Special oak woodlands habitat elements” means multi- and single-layered canopy, riparian zones, cavity trees, snags, and downed woody debris.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 588, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1362.

It is the intent of the Legislature that this article accomplish all of the following:

(a) Support and encourage voluntary, long-term private stewardship and conservation of California’s oak woodlands by offering landowners financial incentives to protect and promote biologically functional oak woodlands over time.

(b) Provide incentives to protect and encourage farming and ranching operations that are operated in a manner that protects and promotes healthy oak woodlands.

(c) Provide incentives for the protection of oak trees providing superior wildlife values on private lands.

(d) Encourage local land use planning that is consistent with the preservation of oak woodlands, particularly special oak woodlands habitat elements.

(e) Provide guidelines for spending the funds allocated for oak woodlands pursuant to the Safe Neighborhood Parks, Clean Water, Clean Air, and Coastal Protection Bond Act of 2000 (the Villaraigosa-Keeley Act (Chapter 1.692 (commencing with Section 5096.300) of Division 5 of the Public Resources Code)).

(f) Establish a fund for oak woodlands conservation, to which future appropriations for oak woodlands protection may be made, and specify grant making guidelines.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 588, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1363.

(a) The Oak Woodlands Conservation Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury. The fund shall be administered by the board. Moneys in the fund may be expended, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the purposes of this article.

(b) Money may be deposited into the fund from gifts, donations, funds appropriated by the Legislature for the purposes of this article, or from federal grants or loans or other sources, and shall be used for the purpose of implementing this article, including administrative costs. Funds from the Safe Neighborhood Parks, Clean Water, Clean Air, and Coastal Protection Bond Act of 2000 (the Villaraigosa-Keeley Act (Chapter 1.692 (commencing with Section 5096.300) of Division 5 of the Public Resources Code)), but not including funds dedicated as matching funds for the federal Forest Legacy Program, shall be deposited in the fund.

(c) To the extent consistent with the Safe Neighborhood Parks, Clean Water, Clean Air, and Coastal Protection Bond Act of 2000 (the Villaraigosa-Keeley Act (Chapter 1.692 (commencing with Section 5096.300) of Division 5 of the Public Resources Code)), the board may use money designated for the preservation and restoration of oak woodlands in the Oak Woodlands Conservation Fund for projects in conjunction with the California Forest Legacy Program (Div. 10.5 (commencing with Sec. 12200) of the P.R.C.)), but only for the purposes specified in this article and only if the following requirements are met:

(1) The Department of Forestry and Fire Protection shall make an initial recommendation to the board.

(2) The board may deny any initial recommendation to the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection. Subsequently, if the department alters an initial proposal, in a manner that the board determines to be significant, the board may withdraw its initial approval of the recommendation at any time during the process.

(d) The purposes for which moneys in the fund may be used include all of the following:

(1) Grants for the purchase of oak woodlands conservation easements. Any entity authorized to hold a conservation easement under Section 815.3 of the Civil Code may hold a conservation easement pursuant to this article. The holder of the conservation easement shall ensure, on an annual basis, that the conservation easement conditions have been met for that year.

(2) Grants for land improvement.

(3) Cost-sharing incentive payments to private landowners who enter into long-term conservation agreements. An agreement shall include management practices that benefit oak woodlands and promote the economic sustainability of farming and ranching operations.

(4) Public education and outreach by local government entities, park and open-space districts, resource conservation districts, and nonprofit organizations. The public education and outreach shall identify and communicate the social, economic, agricultural, and biological benefits of strategies to conserve oak woodlands habitat values, including watershed protection benefits that reduce soil erosion, increase streamflows, and increase water retention and sustainable agricultural operations.

(5) Assistance to local government entities, park and open-space districts, resource conservation districts, and nonprofit organizations for the development and implementation of oak conservation elements in local general plans.

(6) Technical assistance consistent with the purpose of preserving oak woodlands.

(e) Not more than 20 percent of all grants made by the board pursuant to this article may be used for the purposes described in paragraphs (4), (5), and (6) of subdivision (d). Not less than 80 percent of funds available for grants pursuant to this article shall be expended for the purposes described in paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of subdivision (d).

(f) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this article governs the expenditure of funds for the preservation of oak woodlands pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 5096.350 of the Public Resources Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 588, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1364.

Moneys in the fund shall be available to local government entities, park and open-space districts, resource conservation districts, private landowners, and nonprofit organizations for the purposes set forth in subdivision (d) of Section 1363.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 588, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1365.

The board shall develop and adopt guidelines and criteria for awarding grants that achieve the greatest lasting conservation of oak woodlands. The board shall develop these guidelines in consultation with the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, the Department of Food and Agriculture, the University of California’s Integrated Hardwood Range Management Program, conservation groups, and farming and ranching associations. As it applies to the award of grants for the implementation of this article, the board criteria shall specify that easement acquisitions that are the most cost-effective in comparison to the actual resource value of the easement shall be given priority.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 588, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1366.

(a) To qualify for a grant pursuant to this article, the county or city in which the grant money would be spent shall prepare, or demonstrate that it has already prepared, an oak woodlands management plan that includes a description of all native oak species located within the county’s or city’s jurisdiction.

(b) To qualify for a grant pursuant to this article, the board shall certify that any proposed easement was not, and is not, required to satisfy a condition imposed upon the landowner by any lease, permit, license, certificate, or other entitlement for use issued by one or more public agencies, including, but not limited to, the mitigation of significant effects on the environment of a project pursuant to an approved environmental impact report or to mitigate a negative declaration required pursuant to the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000)) of the Public Resources Code.

(c) To qualify for a grant under this article, the applicant shall demonstrate that its proposal provides protection of oak woodlands that is more protective than the applicable provisions of law in existence on the date of the proposal.

(d) A county or city may develop an oak woodlands management plan. A nonprofit corporation, park and open-space district, resource conservation district, or other local government entity may apply to the board for funds to develop an oak woodlands management plan for a county or city, but the county or city shall maintain ultimate authority to approve the oak woodlands management plan.

(e) The process for developing an initial oak woodlands management plan, and the adoption of significant amendments to a plan, as determined by the county or city, are subject to the Ralph M. Brown Act (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code).

(f) A proposal by a local government entity, nonprofit corporation, park and open-space district, private landowner, or resource conservation district for a grant to be expended for the purposes of this article shall be certified by the county or city as being consistent with the oak woodlands management plan of the county or city. If the land covered by the proposal is in the jurisdiction of more than one county or city, each county or city shall certify that the proposal is consistent with the oak woodlands management plan of each county or city.

(g) If two or more entities seek grant funding from the board pursuant to this article for the same jurisdiction, the county or city shall designate which entity shall lead the efforts to manage oak woodlands habitat in the area.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 588, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1367.

On or before April 1, 2002, the board and the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection shall develop a memorandum of understanding regarding the protection of oak woodlands that does all of the following:

(a) If necessary, creates a specific process for working together to use money from the fund in conjunction with the California Forest Legacy Program Act of 2000 (Division 10.5 (commencing with Section 12200) of the Public Resources Code).
